Idaho, session 2026, H0663.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-417B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-417B. IDAHO AGRICULTURE PLATES. (1) On and after January 1, 2000,
any Any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions
of section 49-402 or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, may apply for Idaho agriculture
plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with
a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds.
Availability of Idaho agriculture plates for other vehicles may be autho-
rized by rule of the board.
(2) In addition to the regular operating fee, the applicant shall be
charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of
the plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual
registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars
($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account
and shall be used to fund the cost of the administration of this special li-
cense plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and
fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by warrant
on a monthly basis by the Idaho transportation department to Idaho ag in the
classroom created by the provisions of section 57-815, Idaho Code.
(3) Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provi-
sions of pursuant to this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may
transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required
transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates after receipt of new
registration from the department.
(4) The Idaho agriculture license plate shall be of a color and design
in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. That por-
tion of the design which features Idaho agriculture shall be that is accept-
able to the Food Producers of Idaho, Inc. Idaho ag in the classroom board
of directors and shall be approved by the department utilizing and utilize a
numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate
program, including the cost of plate design, shall be paid from the Idaho ag
in the classroom account.
(5) Sample Idaho agriculture plates may be purchased from the depart-
ment for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which
shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00)


of which shall be transferred by warrant on a monthly basis by the Idaho
transportation department to Idaho ag in the classroom.
SECTION 2. That Section 49-402C, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-402C. SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE PROGRAMS -- STANDARDIZED PLATE COLOR
AND DESIGN. (1) It is the intent of the legislature that special license
plates issued by the department be readily recognizable as plates from the
state of Idaho without losing the uniqueness for which the special plate was
designed and purchased. In addition, the legislature finds that the depart-
ment can operate in a more efficient, cost-effective manner by conforming
special plates to a basic color and design.
(2)(a) No special license plates and no special license plate programs
in existence on or before June 30, 1998, shall be affected by the pro-
visions of subsections (2) through (5) of this section. On and after
July 1, 1998, any new special license plate program authorized or any
redesign of an existing special license plate shall use the same red,
white and blue background as the standard issue of license plates de-
scribed in section 49-443, Idaho Code, except that:
(a) (i) The identification of county shall be omitted;
(b) (ii) The word "Idaho" shall appear on every plate;
(c) (iii) The inscription "Scenic Idaho" may be omitted without
legislative consideration and approval; and
(d) (iv) No slogan shall be used that infringes upon, dilutes or
compromises, or could be perceived to infringe upon, dilute or
compromise, the trademarks of the state of Idaho, including, but
not limited to, "Idaho Potatoes®," "Grown in Idaho™," "Famous
Idaho Potatoes™" or "Famous Potatoes®."
(b) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the plate de-
signs issued pursuant to the provisions of section 49-417 or 49-417B,
Idaho Code.
(3) Any redesign required for a special plate to conform with legisla-
tive intent and the provisions of this section may be done in a manner similar
to that used to produce the original design.
(4) The special plates shall conform in all other respects with the pro-
visions of section 49-443, Idaho Code, relating to visibility requirements,
display of registration number, time period for validity of plates, and
reservation of plate numbers.
(5) Unless otherwise specifically provided, no special license plates
shall be issued to motor vehicles with a registered maximum gross weight in
excess of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds, or any motor vehicle regis-
tered under section 49-434(5), Idaho Code, or section 49-435, Idaho Code.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, on and
after July 1, 2020, no new special license plate or special license plate
program shall be established for the benefit of any entity that is not the
state of Idaho or an agency of the state of Idaho. With respect to any spe-
cial license plate program that is in existence on July 1, 2020, that has a
nonprofit agency as a recipient of the proceeds from the sales of such plate,
if fewer than one thousand (1,000) plates are issued in the first year of
the special plate program's existence, fewer than one thousand five hundred


(1,500) plates are issued in the second year of the special plate program's
existence, or fewer than two thousand (2,000) plates in the third or any sub-
sequent year of such special plate program's existence, the department shall
discontinue that special license plate program.
(7) With respect to a special license plate that has been discontinued
prior to July 1, 2020, or is discontinued after that date for any reason, any
existing plates may be renewed upon their expiration until the physical li-
cense plates must be replaced pursuant to section 49-443(2), Idaho Code. No
duplicate or replacement plates will be produced if such plates are lost or
damaged.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.